Idaho, session 2025, H0024.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 37, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 16, Title 37, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 16
ALTERNATIVE ANIMAL PROTEIN LABELING REQUIREMENTS
37-1601. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Alternative animal proteins" means food products derived from an-
imal sources other than traditional livestock production or wild game har-
vest and includes:
(a) "Lab-grown meat," "cultivated meat," or "cell-cultured meat,"
which means meat or meat products produced through cellular production
by culturing animal cells outside of the animal's body; and
(b) "Insect protein," which means any protein derived from the body,
larvae, eggs, or other parts of insects, processed or unprocessed, and
intended for human consumption.
(2) "Common name" means the generally recognized name of an insect
species, such as "cricket," "mealworm," or "grasshopper."
(3) "Meat" means the edible flesh of an animal.
37-1602. LABELING REQUIREMENTS FOR ALTERNATIVE ANIMAL PROTEINS. (1)
Any alternative animal protein product sold, distributed, or offered for
sale within the state of Idaho shall include on the front of its package, in
clear and conspicuous text:
(a) For lab-grown meat products, the phrase "lab-grown meat," "cell-
cultivated meat," or "cell-cultured meat."
(b) For insect protein products, the phrase "contains [common name of
insect]," such as "contains crickets" or "contains mealworms."
(2) The labeling shall:
(a) Appear on the principal display panel of the packaging; and
(b) Use a font size and style that ensures legibility to an average con-
sumer and is at least equal in prominence to the product name.
(3) Restaurants or other vendors that offer for sale alternative animal
proteins shall provide labeling on menus or equivalent notifications con-
sistent with this section.


37-1603. INGREDIENT LIST REQUIREMENTS FOR INSECT PROTEIN PRODUCTS. In
addition to front-of-package labeling, the ingredient list on all food prod-
ucts containing insect protein shall include:
(1) The common name of the insect species; and
(2) The scientific name of the insect species in parentheses following
the common name, such as, "cricket (Acheta domesticus)" or "mealworm (Tene-
brio molitor)."
37-1604. REGULATORY OVERSIGHT. The Idaho department of agriculture
shall have the authority to:
(1) Promulgate rules, subject to legislative approval, to enforce the
provisions of this chapter, including additional labeling standards if nec-
essary; and
(2) Conduct inspections and investigations to ensure compliance.
37-1605. PENALTIES. (1) Any person found in violation of this chapter
may be subject to a civil penalty by the Idaho department of agriculture of
not more than five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.
(2) Each improperly labeled package shall constitute a separate viola-
tion.
(3) Additional penalties for repeat offenses may be established by the
Idaho department of agriculture through rulemaking, subject to legislative
approval.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.